Maine, session 132, LD308.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §3906-C, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2001, c. 399,
§3, is amended to read:
6. Administration; meetings. The council shall elect one of its members as chair.
The chair serves for a 2-year period and may not serve as chair for consecutive 2-year
periods.
The council shall hold regular public meetings at least every other month but may waive
by majority vote a succeeding meeting. The chair shall call special meetings of the council
whenever requested in writing by 2 or more members. The council shall send notice and
minutes of the meetings to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over animal welfare matters.
The chair may delegate, as necessary, duties to members of the council, either individually
or through the formation of subcommittees, to carry out the functions of the council.
Page 1 - 132LR1052(03)